North Dakota, session 69, HB1290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 53-06.1-01.1 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
4. The commission shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 28-32, to administer and
regulate the gaming industry, including methods of conduct, play, and promotion of
games; minimum procedures and standards for recordkeeping and internal control;
requiring tax returns and reports from organizations or distributors; methods of
competition and doing business by distributors and manufacturers; acquisition and use
of gaming equipment; quality standards or specifications for the manufacture of pull
tabs, paper bingo cards, electronic pull tab devices, pull tab dispensing devices, bingo
card marking devices, and fifty-fifty raffle systems; to ensure that net proceeds are
used for educational, charitable, patriotic, fraternal, religious, or public-spirited uses; to
protect and promote the public interest; to ensure fair and honest games; to ensure
that fees and taxes are paid; and to prevent and detect unlawful gambling activity. The
commission may not adopt a rule requiring an electronic pull tab game or deal to be
closed at the end of a quarter, but may adopt a rule requiring a report to be generated
and printed at the end of a quarter.
Page No. 1 25.1028.01000